Utah statutes.
53A-13-103.   Eye protective devices for industrial education, physics laboratory, and chemistry laboratory activities.

(1)  Any individual who participates in any of the following activities in public or private schools that may endanger his vision shall wear quality eye protective devices:

(a)  industrial education activities that involve:

(i)  hot molten metals;

(ii)  the operation of equipment that could throw particles of foreign matter into the eyes;

(iii)  heat treating, tempering, or kiln firing of any industrial materials;

(iv)  gas or electric arc welding; or

(v)  caustic or explosive material;

(b)  chemistry or physics laboratories when using caustic or explosive chemicals, and hot liquids and solids.

(2)  "Quality eye protective devices" means devices that meet the standards of the American Safety Code for Head, Eye, and Respiratory Protection, Z2.1-1959, promulgated by the American Standards Association, Inc.

(3) (a)  The local school board shall furnish these protective devices to individuals involved in these activities.

(b)  The board may sell these protective devices at cost or rent or loan them to individuals involved in these activities.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

